Missouri, session 2026, HB1694.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 537, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 537.1250, to read as follows:
537.1250. 1. (1) This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Act
Against Abusive Website Access Litigation".
(2) As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(a) "Access violation", any allegation that a public accommodation fails to
comply with the accessibility requirements of the federal Americans with Disabilities
Act or under state law;
(b) "Public accommodation", the same as defined in 42 U.S.C. Section 2000 et
seq. For the purposes of this section, "public accommodation" includes a website
operated by a resident of this state;
(c) "Resident of this state", any individual residing in Missouri or any entity that
has registered with the Missouri secretary of state's office under chapter 351.
2. (1) The attorney general under section 507.070 on behalf of a class of
residents of this state who are subject to litigation that alleges any website access
violation, or any resident of this state who is subject to litigation that alleges any website
access violation, may file a civil action in any court of competent jurisdiction within this
state against the party, attorney, or law firm that initiated such litigation for a
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HBs 1694, 1674, 1780, 2056, et al. 2
determination as to whether such litigation alleging a website access violation is abusive
litigation.
(2) In determining whether any litigation that alleges any website access
violation constitutes abusive litigation, the court shall consider the totality of the
circumstances to determine if the primary purpose of the litigation that alleges a website
access violation is obtaining a payment from a defendant. For the purposes of making
this determination, the court may assess the following factors and any other factors the
court deems relevant for assessing:
(a) Whether the same plaintiff, attorney, or law firm has filed a high number of
substantially similar lawsuits without meaningful efforts to resolve or improve
accessibility;
(b) Whether the plaintiff provided the defendant with reasonable notice and an
opportunity to correct the alleged barrier prior to filing suit;
(c) Any history of sanctions or findings of bad faith against the plaintiff or
counsel;
(d) Whether the filing party or lawyer filing the litigation is a resident of this
state or is licensed to practice law in this state;
(e) The nature of settlement discussions and the reasonableness of settlement
offers and refusals to settle. The application of such settlement information shall be
used only as provided by this section and shall not otherwise alter the rules of evidence
applicable to such court; and
(f) Whether any factors under Missouri supreme court rule 55.03(c) exist in the
litigation and whether sanctions are appropriate under Missouri supreme court rule
55.03(d).
(3) A defendant who receives written notice of an alleged website accessibility
violation and in good faith initiates substantial steps to correct it within ninety days shall
have a rebuttable presumption that any subsequent claim for a website accessibility
violation is abusive. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a defendant
from filing a motion to dismiss or from notifying the plaintiff, prior to the expiration of
the ninety-day period, that the alleged accessibility violation has been corrected in good
faith. The presumption may be overcome by showing that the defendant failed to
complete reasonable corrective measures within ninety days or acted in bad faith. The
trier of fact shall not determine whether such litigation is abusive litigation until after
such ninety-day period expires or the alleged violation is corrected, as determined by the
court, whichever occurs first.
3. The attorney general may intervene or bring an action on behalf of Missouri
residents or entities that are the targets of abusive website access litigation as defined in

HCS HBs 1694, 1674, 1780, 2056, et al. 3
this section. The attorney general may also issue guidance or determinations clarifying
when litigation practices are deemed abusive, but such determinations shall not
preclude legitimate accessibility enforcement actions.
4. If the trier of fact determines that an initiator of an action under subsection 2
of this section is a defendant in abusive litigation, the court may award reasonable
attorney's fees and costs in bringing the action under subsection 2 of this section as well
as defending against the abusive litigation to be paid by the party bringing the abusive
litigation. In addition, the court may award punitive damages or sanctions not to exceed
three times the amount of attorney's fees awarded by the court.
5. At the conclusion of the litigation alleging a website access violation, the court
shall review any determination that such litigation is abusive and any award of
attorney's fees under the Missouri rules of professional conduct to determine the
reasonableness of the award before issuing a judgment.
6. If the federal Department of Justice issues standards concerning website
accessibility under Title III of the federal Americans with Disabilities Act, the attorney
general shall notify the revisor of statutes that such standards have been issued. Upon
receipt of such notification by the revisor, the provisions of this section shall expire.
✔